Maryland, session 2026, HB0166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0166*

HOUSE BILL 166
Article – Health – General State Government
SUBTITLE 28. 42. HENRIETTA LACKS COMMISSION.
24–2801. 9–4201.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “COMMISSION” MEANS THE HENRIETTA LACKS
COMMISSION.
24–2802. 9–4202.
(A) THERE IS A HENRIETTA LACKS COMMISSION.
(B) THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(1) ONE ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, APPOINTED
BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(2) ONE ONE MEMBER OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES, APPOINTED BY
THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(3) THE THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH SOCIAL AND ECONOMIC
MOBILITY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(4) THE THE SECRETARY OF COMMERCE, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(5) THE THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF EDUCATION, OR THE
SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE; AND
(6) THE CHAIR OF THE STATE ANATOMY BOARD, OR THE CHAIR’S
DESIGNEE; AND
(7) THE THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR:
(I) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE STATE ETHICS
COMMISSION;
(II) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE LIFE SCIENCES ADVISORY
BOARD;
(III) ONE ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT COMMISSION;

HOUSE BILL 166 3
(IV) (II) ONE ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND
BOARD OF TOURISM; AND
(V) (III) ONE ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND
STATE ARCHIVES.
(C) THE GOVERNOR SECRETARY OF SOCIAL AND ECONOMIC MOBILITY
SHALL DESIGNATE THE CHAIR OF THE COMMISSION.
(D) THE TERM OF A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION IS 2 YEARS.
(E) THE STATE AGENCIES REPRESENTED ON THE COMMISSION JOINTLY
SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE COMMISSION.
(F) A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION:
(1) MAY MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
COMMISSION; BUT
(2) IS IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(G) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE O’NEILL INSTITUTE OF NATIONAL
AND GLOBAL HEALTH LAW, CONDUCT BIOETHICAL OVERSIGHT OF LIFE SCIENCES
ACTIVITIES IN THE STATE THAT INVOLVE HUMAN RESEARCH AND BODY, ORGAN,
AND TISSUE DONATION FOR MEDICAL TRAINING;
(2) PROMOTE PROMOTE EDUCATION OF THE LIFE OF HENRIETTA
LACKS AND HELA SCIENCE AS DEVELOPED BY THE NATIONAL INSTITUTES OF
HEALTH;
(3) (2) CURATE CURATE A REGISTRY OF SIGNIFICANT TRIBUTES TO
HENRIETTA LACKS;
(4) (3) WORK WORK WITH APPROPRIATE STATE AGENCIES TO
INCLUDE TRIBUTES TO HENRIETTA LACKS IN STATE TOURISM CAMPAIGNS;
(5) (4) PROMOTE PROMOTE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OF THE
TURNER STATION COMMUNITY OF DUNDALK; AND

HOUSE BILL 166
(6) (5) MAKE MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS ON IMPLEMENTING THE
GOALS OF THE COMMISSION.
(H) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2027, THE
COMMISSION SHALL REPORT ON ITS ACTIVITIES TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE THIS ARTICLE,
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.